Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-18-80.
Other methods for obtaining old-age, survivors, and disability insurance coverage for employees of the state.

Social security coverage for employees of this state as provided for in this chapter shall be the sole and exclusive method for obtaining such coverage regardless of the source of funds used for payment of salaries or wages.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 586, § 2.